Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.080

Superintendent of the school district.

"Superintendent of the school district", if there be no such superintendent, shall mean such other administrative or certificated employee as the school district board of directors shall so designate.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.100. Formerly RCW 28A.01.100.]